hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.aff
SFX e N 54
SFX e 0 дарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 дарыңыз [аоуұыэ]з sf:дарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 дарыңыз [аоуұыэ]л sf:дарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 дарыңыз [аоуұыэ]м sf:дарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 дарыңыз [аоуұыэ]н sf:дарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 дарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ң sf:дарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 деріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:деріңіз:0
SFX e 0 деріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:деріңіз:0
SFX e 0 деріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:деріңіз:0
SFX e 0 деріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:деріңіз:0
SFX e 0 деріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:деріңіз:0
SFX e 0 деріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:деріңіз:0
SFX e 0 ларыңыз [аоуұыэ] sf:ларыңыз:0
SFX e 0 ларыңыз [аоуұыэ]й sf:ларыңыз:0
SFX e 0 ларыңыз [аоуұыэ]р sf:ларыңыз:0
SFX e 0 ларыңыз [аоуұыэ]у sf:ларыңыз:0
SFX e 0 леріңіз [әеёиөүіюя] sf:леріңіз:0
SFX e 0 леріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:леріңіз:0
SFX e 0 леріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:леріңіз:0
SFX e 0 леріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:леріңіз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]б sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]в sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]г sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]д sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]к sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]қ sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]һ sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]п sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]с sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]т sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ф sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]х sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ц sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ч sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ш sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]щ sf:тарыңыз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:теріңіз:0
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:теріңіз:0
SFX F N 55
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:і:0
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:і:0
SFX F 0 сі [әеёиөүіюя] sf:сі:0
SFX F 0 сы [аоұыэ] sf:сы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]б sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]в sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]г sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]д sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ж sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]з sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]й sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]к sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]қ sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]л sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]м sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]н sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ң sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]һ sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]п sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]р sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]с sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]т sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоұыэ]у sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ф sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]х sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ц sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ч sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ш sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]щ sf:ы:0
SFX F 0 ы у sf:ы:0
SFX f N 54
SFX f 0 дары [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дары:0
SFX f 0 дары [аоуұыэ]з sf:дары:0
SFX f 0 дары [аоуұыэ]л sf:дары:0
SFX f 0 дары [аоуұыэ]м sf:дары:0
SFX f 0 дары [аоуұыэ]н sf:дары:0
SFX f 0 дары [аоуұыэ]ң sf:дары:0
SFX f 0 дері [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:дері:0
SFX f 0 дері [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:дері:0
SFX f 0 дері [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:дері:0
SFX f 0 дері [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:дері:0
SFX f 0 дері [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:дері:0
SFX f 0 дері [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:дері:0
SFX f 0 лары [аоуұыэ] sf:лары:0
SFX f 0 лары [аоуұыэ]й sf:лары:0
SFX f 0 лары [аоуұыэ]р sf:лары:0
SFX f 0 лары [аоуұыэ]у sf:лары:0
SFX f 0 лері [әеёиөүіюя] sf:лері:0
SFX f 0 лері [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:лері:0
SFX f 0 лері [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:лері:0
SFX f 0 лері [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:лері:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]б sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]в sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]г sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]д sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]к sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]қ sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]һ sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]п sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]с sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]т sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]ф sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]х sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]ц sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]ч sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]ш sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]щ sf:тары:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:тері:0
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:тері:0
SFX G N 54
SFX G 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:дің:0
SFX G 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:дің:0
SFX G 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:дің:0
SFX G 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:дің:0
SFX G 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:дің:0
SFX G 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:дің:0
SFX G 0 дың [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дың:0
SFX G 0 дың [аоуұыэ]з sf:дың:0
SFX G 0 дың [аоуұыэ]й sf:дың:0
SFX G 0 дың [аоуұыэ]л sf:дың:0
SFX G 0 дың [аоуұыэ]м sf:дың:0
SFX G 0 дың [аоуұыэ]у sf:дың:0
SFX G 0 нің [әеёиөүіюя] sf:нің:0
SFX G 0 нің [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:нің:0
SFX G 0 нің [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:нің:0
SFX G 0 нің [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:нің:0
SFX G 0 ның [аоуұыэ] sf:ның:0
SFX G 0 ның [аоуұыэ]н sf:ның:0
SFX G 0 ның [аоуұыэ]ң sf:ның:0
SFX G 0 ның [аоуұыэ]р sf:ның:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:тің:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]б sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]в sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]г sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]д sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]к sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]қ sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]һ sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]п sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]с sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]т sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]ф sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]х sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]ц sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]ч sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]ш sf:тың:0
SFX G 0 тың [аоуұыэ]щ sf:тың:0
