hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.dic
адамгершіл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
азған/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
айтақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
айғақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
алатын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
алмасын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
амбулаторияларын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
апаратын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
арбал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
артықтығы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
астарлас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
атаққұмар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аударуға/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ауған/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аямпаз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ақи/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ақырьш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бажырайт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
балаларын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
банкін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бауыздат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бейбастақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
беташар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
болғанынша/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
буынқап/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бірлескен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бұзаула/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бұғаула/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бөрітіс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
гетман/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
далбай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
делдал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дмитриенко/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
діңгене/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дәуаяқ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
елен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ересен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ете/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жайдақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жаназа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жасалмай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жақыбай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жеркепе/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жолдастарыңның/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жылыла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жүктеледі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жұқарт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
зерттеулер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
иман/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
капсюль/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
келдек/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кесеқап/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
клеенка/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кристалды/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күжілдет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күпірлі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көбейген/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көмбе/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көшесін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
литота/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
максвелл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мастер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мд/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
меймандат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
милитарист/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
морт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мүддел/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мұһамед/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
налыс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
нешінші/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
одыраңда/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
опалат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
оспақшыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
оңқа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
пе/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
пресса/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
радиозавод/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ремонт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
рәуішті/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
самарқаулан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сатудан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сегізінші/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
символизм/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сопандат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
субұрыш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сымпылдат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сілікпе/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сұр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
табандатқыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тамада/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тарпы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тақылет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тепкі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тойлан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
топырлаттыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тоқтышақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
турбинашы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тырнақшагүл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тізелеткіз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тірілт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түйілме/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түріс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тұндырма/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тұқи/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
төмендет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
уротропин/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
фольклористика/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
хроматин/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шалпылдатқыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шарылдас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шегелен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ширатыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шоқырақтатқыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шырыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шүлекей/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ызбан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ықтасынсыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ілбит/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ғұжыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қазбалас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қайқалаңдат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қамдал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қаражатына/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қарсала/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қатер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қашаңдас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қаңқит/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қожамсын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қоныстас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қошемет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қызарған/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қырдағы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қыштас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құмар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құтқарыс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үле/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үңгіткіз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ұса/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
әжетай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
әртүрлі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
өкірт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
өңкиген/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
Саулет/BbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
